District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this Act
may be cited as the “Ensuring Access and Supporting Engagement (EASE) for DOC
residents Act of 2025”.

Sec. 2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this Act, the term:
(1) “ANC Commissioner” shall have the same meaning as provided in 738(a) of
the Home Rule Act of 1973, effective December 24, 1973 (Public Law 93-198; D.C. Official
Code § 1–207.38).
“(2) “Electronic device” means a device that enables access to, or use of, online
and internet communication services, including a telephone, tablet, or computer.
“(3) “Resident” means an individual who is incarcerated in the Central Detention
Facility, Correction Treatment Facility, or any other facility operated by the Department of
Corrections to house incarcerated individuals, except the Central Cell Block.
“(4) “Video conference” means conducting a conference between two or more
participants at different sites using computer networks to transmit audio and video data using
remote meeting technologies.
Sec. 3. Right to testify before the Council.
(a) DOC shall facilitate residents’ ability to observe public meetings of, and provide
interactive video and written testimony, to the Council of the District of Columbia. This Act
shall apply to all residents detained or incarcerated at the Central Detention Facility, the
Correctional Treatment Facility, and any other penal institution owned, operated, or controlled
by the Department of Corrections (“DOC”). Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a
private right of action.
(b) If a committee, in the publication of notice of a hearing or roundtable, sets a deadline
before which a person must contact the committee to be permitted to be a witness at the public

hearing, then at the time that the public hearing is held, each resident who complied with the
committee’s requirements shall be given an opportunity to testify.
(c) DOC shall promulgate policies and procedures to facilitate the opportunity of
residents to exercise the provisions under subsection (b), including providing alternative methods
to provide testimony if a person is unable to meet the provisions under this section.
Sec. 4. Access to Electronic Devices and Internet Service.
(a) DOC shall provide access to electronic devices and internet service for the purpose of
allowing residents to:
(1) Register in a timely manner as a public witness to orally testify, by way of
video conference, at a hearing, roundtable, or other public event of the Council;
(2) Submit written testimony to the Council before or after a hearing or
roundtable in which the resident will participate or participated as a public witness or for which
the resident wants to submit written testimony; and
(3) Provide oral testimony, by way of video conference, and answer questions
from councilmembers during any hearing for which they are scheduled to appear as a witness.
(b) DOC shall promulgate policies and procedures for residents to utilize electronic
devices and internet services and to provide interactive oral testimony by way of video
conference before the Council.
Sec. 5. Informing Residents of Right to Testify and Related Procedures.
(a) Residents shall be provided with informational and educational resources, including
how to access their ANC Commissioner and Councilmember, at the time they are transferred to
the Central Detention Facility, the Correctional Treatment Facility, or any other penal institution

owned, operated, or controlled by the Department of Corrections (“DOC”), except for the
Central Cell Block.
(b) DOC shall inform all residents of their right to testify before the Council and the
policies and procedures for doing so.
(1) DOC shall provide educational materials for distribution to residents
regarding:
(A) The legislative process;
(B) Residents’ right to participate in the legislative process;
(C) The policies and procedures for providing testimony at Council
hearings while in DOC custody; and
(D) Advisory Neighborhood Commissions (“ANCs”), the role of ANC
Commissioners, and how to contact the ANC Commissioner for the single-member district
100 encompassing the DOC facilities.
101 (2) DOC shall provide the materials developed pursuant to paragraph (1) to
102 residents upon intake, and after intake upon request, as well as make such materials readily
103 available in the law library and case manager offices and post in housing units in DOC facilities.
104 Sec. 6. Right to access ANC.
105 (a) All residents have the right to engagement with their ANC Commissioner.
106 (b) DOC shall provide residents access to the ANC Commissioner by:
107 (1) Providing all necessary materials, including phone numbers and access to
108 electronic devices and internet service, to residents free of charge for the purpose of
109 communicating with the ANC Commissioner;

110 (2) Establishing a process that provides the ANC Commissioner with the ability to
111 walk through the facilities to communicate and meet with all persons in their single-member
112 district, at least quarterly.
113 Sec. 7. Reduction of cost barriers.
114 DOC shall provide residents with a no-cost method for mailing written testimony to the
115 Council and corresponding with the Council incident to the provision of testimony.
116 Sec. 8. Tracking and Reporting.
117 (a) One year after the effective date of this Act, and annually thereafter, DOC shall
118 submit a report to the Mayor and Council regarding the following:
119 (1) To the extent known by DOC, the number of residents that sought to testify
120 before the Council or communicate with or meet with the ANC Commissioner but were denied
121 access by DOC, and the reasons for which their access was denied;
122 (2) Summaries of requests to staff and grievance reports related to civic
123 engagement;
124 (3) An analysis of this Act’s implementation and any identifiable challenges; and
125 (4) Any policy or legislative recommendations to ensure that all residents have
126 meaningful opportunities to participate in civic engagement with the Council and ANC.
127 (b) DOC shall publish quarterly reports on its website after the ANC Commissioner’s
128 quarterly walkthrough described in section 6(b)(2), including but not limited to:
129 (1) The date of the walkthrough;
130 (2) The time of the walkthrough; and
131 (3) Each facility and unit visited during the walkthrough.
132 Sec. 9. Fiscal impact statement.

133 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
134 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
135 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
136 Sec. 10. Effective date.
137 This Act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
138 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
139 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
140 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
141 Columbia Register.